Hawaii statutes.
[§200-72] Defacing, etc., vessel hull
identification numbers. No person shall wilfully deface, destroy, remove,
or alter the vessel hull identification number which is carved, burned,
stamped, embossed, or otherwise permanently affixed to the hull of a vessel by
the manufacturer, or by the owner in the case of restoration, for the purpose
of identifying the hull. This section does not prohibit the restoration by an
owner of an original number when the restoration is authorized by the
department, nor prevent any manufacturer from placing in the ordinary course of
business, numbers or marks upon new hulls. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next